Illinois, session 104th, HB3237.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by adding 5Section 6-3.1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/6-3.1 new)7    Sec. 6-3.1. Trafficking victims; defense.8    (a) In this Section, "trafficking victim" has the meaning 9ascribed to the term in paragraph (10) of subsection (a) of 10Section 10-9. 11    (b) A person is not engaged in conduct that would 12constitute a felony or a Class A misdemeanor or in a place 13where the person does not have a right to be if the person is 14engaged in the activity or in the place due to the person's 15status as a trafficking victim. 16    (c) The person must prove the person's status as a 17trafficking victim by clear and convincing evidence.18    (d) The person may provide clear and convincing evidence 19of the person's status as a trafficking victim through 20testimony at trial.